North Carolina statutes. Chapter 28A. Administration of Decedents’ Estates.
Article 1. Definitions and Other General Provisions.

§ 28A-1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this Chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:

“Collector” means any person authorized to take possession, custody, or control of the personal property of the decedent for the purpose of executing the duties outlined in

G.S. 28A-11-3

. (1a) “Devisee” means any person entitled to take real or personal property under the provisions of a valid, probated will.

(1b) “Estate proceeding” means a matter initiated by petition related to the administration, distribution, or settlement of an estate, other than a special proceeding. There may be more than one estate proceeding within the administration of a decedent’s
estate.

“Foreign personal representative” means a personal representative appointed in another jurisdiction, including a personal representative appointed in another country.

“Heir” means any person entitled to take real or personal property upon intestacy under the provisions of Chapter 29 of the General Statutes.

“Mortgage” includes a deed of trust. (4a) “Party,” in the context of a contested or uncontested estate proceeding pursuant to

G.S. 28A-2-6

, means a party joined as a petitioner or respondent.

(4b) “Person” means an individual; corporation; business trust; estate; trust; partnership; limited liability company; association; joint venture; government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or any other legal
or commercial entity.

“Personal representative” includes both an executor and an administrator, but does not include a collector.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-344, s. 4, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date.

History.
1973, c. 1329, s. 3; 1981, c. 955, c. 4; 2011-344, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 4, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, added subdivisions (1b), (4a), and (4b); and deleted subdivision (6), which was the definition for “Service.”

Legal Periodicals.

For case law survey on wills and administration, see 41 N.C.L. Rev. 530 (1963).

§ 28A-1-2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 88, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to the abolishment of the doctrine of worthier title, see

G.S. 41-6.2

.